Louisiana, session 2026, HB1257.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:835(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§835. Registration of electronic monitoring service providers
* * *
D.(1) An elected official, or any immediate family member of an elected
official, shall be prohibited from being a vendor, or having No elected judge, district
attorney, sheriff, chief of police, constable, marshal, nor any immediate family of
these individuals shall have an ownership interest or a financial interest in a vendor,
for any company that provides electronic monitoring services in this state.
(2) For the purposes of this Subsection, "immediate family" has the same
meaning as provided in R.S. 42:1102.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.